Massachusetts, session 194th, H1877.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13D of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in line 1, after the word “battery,” the following
words:- including assault and battery by means of a bodily substance,.
SECTION 2. Said section 13D of said chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by inserting, in line 2, after the word “employee,” the following
words:- including but not limited to a public transit worker,.
SECTION 3. Said section 13D of said chapter 265 of the General Laws, as so appearing,
is hereby further amended by inserting, in line 6, after the word “dollars.” the following
sentence:- For the purposes of this section, “bodily substance” shall mean any human secretion,
discharge or emission including, but not limited to, blood, saliva, mucous, semen, urine or feces.
of 1